Hawaii statutes.
§342J-14 Public records; confidential
information; penalties. (a) For purposes of this chapter, chapter 92F
applies to the determination of the types of information that should be made
available to members of the public provided that any information that would be
required to be disclosed under RCRA and the federal Freedom of Information Act,
5 United States Code §552, if these Acts were applicable, shall be open to the
public notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in chapter 92F. The
legislature declares that disclosure of such information which RCRA and the
federal Freedom of Information Act require to be disclosed for purposes of this
chapter does not constitute an unwarranted invasion of privacy.

(b) Information concerning secret processes or
methods of manufacture maintained by an agency pursuant to this chapter shall
not be disclosed to the public unless disclosure of such information would be
required under applicable provisions of RCRA, 42 United States Code, §§6901 to
6991i and the federal Freedom of Information Act, 5 United States Code §552.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, the
department may adopt rules pertaining to both substantive and procedural
aspects of information practices which are consistent with RCRA and the federal
Freedom of Information Act. These rules shall govern information practices
concerning all records maintained by any agency pursuant to this chapter or
RCRA and shall supersede any inconsistent rules promulgated pursuant to chapter
92F. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §5; am L 1991, c 259, §12]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next